Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-380
Amendment or expungement of records; inaccurate or inconsistent with act; procedure.

At any time subsequent to the completion of the department's investigation, if a vulnerable adult, the guardian of a vulnerable adult, or a person who allegedly abused a vulnerable adult and who is mentioned in a report believes the information in the report is inaccurate or being maintained in a manner inconsistent with the Adult Protective Services Act, such person may request the department to amend or expunge identifying information from the report or remove the record of such report from the registry. If the department refuses to do so or does not act within thirty days, the vulnerable adult or person who allegedly abused a vulnerable adult shall have the right to a hearing to determine whether the record of the report should be amended, expunged, or removed on the grounds that it is inaccurate or that it is being maintained in a manner inconsistent with such act. Such hearing shall be held within a reasonable time after a request is made and at a reasonable place and hour. At the hearing the burden of proving the accuracy and consistency of the record shall be on the department. The hearing shall be conducted by the chief executive officer of the department or his or her designated representative, who is hereby authorized and empowered to order the amendment, expunction, or removal of the record to make such record accurate or consistent with the requirements of the Adult Protective Services Act. The decision shall be made in writing within thirty days of the close of the hearing and shall state the reasons upon which it is based. Decisions of the department may be appealed, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 33;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 67;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 53;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 34.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.